Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-620
Cities and villages; special levy;
addition to levy limitations; contribution to state agency.

Notwithstanding
any tax levy limitations contained in any other law or city home rule charter,
when any city or village of this state elects to accept the provisions of
sections 68-601 to 68-631 relating
to old age and survivors insurance and enters into a written agreement with
the state agency as provided in such sections, the city or village shall levy
a tax, in addition to all other taxes, in order to defray the cost of such
city or village in meeting the obligations arising by reason of such written
agreement, and the revenue raised by such special levy shall be used for no
other purpose.

Laws 1951, c. 296, § 1, p. 976;

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 14, p. 821;

Laws 1971, LB 667, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 181;

Laws 1990, LB 820, § 10;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 17;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 8.